New Jersey, session 221, A1213.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and the General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  In addition to the amounts appropriated under P.L.2022, c.49, the annual appropriations act for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2023, there is appropriated from the General Fund the following amount for the purpose specified: 67 DEPARTMENT OF MILITARY AND VETERANS AFFAIRS 80 Special Government Services 83 Services to Veterans 3610 Veterans Program Support GRANTS-IN-AID 50-3610  Veterans Outreach and Assistance .................. $15,000,000 Total Grants-in-Aid appropriation, Veterans Program Support ........................... $15,000,000 Grants-in-Aid: 50    New Jersey Vietnam Veterans Memorial Foundation   ($15,000,000) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.